Utah statutes.
54-7-8.   Offices for utility's books and records -- Production for
examination.
(1)  Each public utility shall have an office in a county of this state in
which its property or some portion thereof is located, and shall keep in said
office all such books, accounts, papers and records as shall be required by
the commission to be kept within this state. No books, accounts, papers or
records required by the commission to be kept within this state shall be at
any time removed from the state except upon such conditions as may be
prescribed by the commission.
(2)  The commission may require, by order served on any public utility in the
manner provided herein for the service of orders, the production within this
state at such time and place as it may designate of any books, accounts,
papers or records kept by said public utility in any office or place without
this state, or at its option verified copies in lieu thereof, so that an
examination thereof may be made by the commission or under its direction.
